src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    C+Use/Circ:C    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    X+Use/Circ:X    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    I+Use/Circ:I    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/Circ:II   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/Circ:III  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/Circ:IV   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/Circ:V    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/Circ:VI   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/Circ:VII  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/Circ:IX   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  +Num+Rom+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Acc+Use/Circ:   #            ;
    +A+Rom+Ord+Sg+Use/Circ:%. #            ; ! !III. as ordinal.
    +A+Rom+Ord+Sg+Use/Circ:   #            ; ! !Looking for trouble...



! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!≈ * **@CODE@** some isolated numeral expressions
           ½+Num:½   # ;
           ¹+Num:¹   # ;
           ²+Num:²   # ;
           ³+Num:³   # ;
           ¼+Num:¼   # ;
           ¾+Num:¾   # ;





!----
